Utah statutes.
70A-4-105.   "Bank" -- "Collecting bank" -- "Depositary bank" --
"Intermediary bank" -- "Payor bank" -- "Presenting bank."
In this chapter:
(1)  "Bank" means a person engaged in the business of banking, including a
savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or trust company.
(2)  "Collecting bank" means a bank handling an item for collection except the
payor bank.
(3)  "Depositary bank" means the first bank to take an item even though it is
also the payor bank unless the item is presented for immediate payment over
the counter.
(4)  "Intermediary bank" means a bank to which an item is transferred in
course of collection except the depositary or payor bank.
(5)  "Payor bank" means a bank that is the drawee of a draft.
(6)  "Presenting bank" means a bank presenting an item except a payor bank.
